sk-SK: Konfigurácia hnacieho ústrojenstva: Pevný prevod; Flip-flop náboj (pevný/voľnobežka); Jednorýchlostný (voľnobežka); Iné
it: Configurazione della trasmissione: Scatto fisso; Mozzo flip-flop (scatto fisso/ruota libera); Velocità singola (ruota libera); Altro
ja: ドライブトレイン構成: 固定ギア; フリップフロップハブ (固定ギア/フリーホイール); シングルスピード (フリーホイール); その他
es: Configuración del tren de transmisión: Piñón fijo; Buje flip-flop (fijo/rueda libre); Una sola velocidad (rueda libre); Otro
nb: Drivverkskonfigurasjon: Fastgir; Flip-flop-nav (fast / frihjul); Ett gir (frihjul); Annet
da: Drivlinjekonfiguration: Fast gear; Flip-flop-nav (fast gear/frihjul); Single-speed (frihjul); Andet
vi: Cấu hình hệ thống truyền động: Bánh răng cố định; Trục lật (Bánh răng cố định/Líp xe); Đơn tốc (Líp xe); Khác
de: Antriebskonfiguration: Starrer Gang; Flip-Flop-Nabe (Starr/Freilauf); Singlespeed (Freilauf); Sonstige
hr-HR: Konfiguracija pogonskog sklopa: Fiksni prijenos; Flip-flop glavčina (Fiksni / Slobodni hod); Jedna brzina (Slobodni hod); Ostalo
cs: Konfigurace pohonného systému: Pevný převod; Náboj flip-flop (pevný/volnoběžka); Jednorychlostní (volnoběžka); Jiné
pl: Konfiguracja układu napędowego: Ostre koło; Piasta flip-flop (ostre koło/wolnobieg); Jednobiegowy (wolnobieg); Inne
ro-RO: Configurația transmisiei: Angrenaj fix; Butuc Flip-Flop (Fix/Liber); O singură viteză (Roată liberă); Altele
pt-BR: Configuração do sistema de transmissão: Engrenagem fixa; Cubo flip-flop (Fixo/Catraca livre); Marcha única (Catraca livre); Outros
th: การกำหนดค่าระบบขับเคลื่อน: ฟิกซ์เกียร์; ดุมพลิกหน้าหลัง (ฟิกซ์/ฟรี); ความเร็วเดียว (ฟรีวีล); อื่นๆ
ko: 구동계 구성: 고정 기어; 플립플롭 허브(고정/프리휠); 싱글 스피드(프리휠); 기타
fi: Voimansiirron kokoonpano: Fiksivälitys; Flip-flop-napa (kiinteä / vapaaratas); Yksivaihteinen (vapaaratas); Muu
lt-LT: Pavaros sistemos konfigūracija: Fiksuota pavara; Dvipusė stebulė (Fiksuota / laisvos eigos); Vienos pavaros (laisvos eigos); Kita
en: Drivetrain configuration: Fixed gear; Flip-flop hub (Fixed/Freewheel); Single-speed (Freewheel); Other
tr: Aktarma sistemi yapılandırması: Sabit vites; Flip-flop göbek (Sabit/Serbest dişli); Tek vitesli (Serbest dişli); Diğer
hu: Hajtáslánc-konfiguráció: Fix hajtás (örökhajtós); Flip-flop agy (fix/szabadonfutó); Egysebességes (szabadonfutó); Egyéb
zh-CN: 传动系统配置: 死飞; 双面花鼓（死飞/飞轮）; 单速（飞轮）; 其他
ru: Конфигурация трансмиссии: Фиксированная передача (фикс); Втулка флип-флоп (фиксированная/свободный ход); Односкоростная (свободный ход); Другое
sl-SI: Konfiguracija pogonskega sklopa: Fiksna prestava; Pesto flip-flop (fiksna prestava/prosti tek); Ena prestava (prosti tek); Drugo
sv: Drivlinans konfiguration: Fast nav; Flip-flop-nav (fast/frihjul); Single speed (frihjul); Övrigt
zh-TW: 傳動系統配置: 死飛/固定齒輪; 雙面花鼓 (固定/飛輪); 單速 (飛輪); 其他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на задвижващата система: Фиксирана предавка; Флип-флоп главина (фиксирана/свободен ход); Една скорост (свободен ход); Друго
nl: Configuratie van aandrijving: Fixed gear; Flip-flop-naaf (fixed/freewheel); Single-speed (freewheel); Overige
el: Διαμόρφωση συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης: Σταθερή ταχύτητα; Κέντρο flip-flop (Σταθερό/Ελεύθερο); Μία ταχύτητα (Ελεύθερο); Άλλο
pt-PT: Configuração do grupo motopropulsor: Roda fixa; Cubo flip-flop (roda fixa/roda livre); Velocidade única (roda livre); Outro
fr: Configuration de la transmission: Pignon fixe; Moyeu flip-flop (pignon fixe/roue libre); Monovitesse (roue libre); Autre